Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1133
Assistance to abate water contamination.

Each district or the department may provide technical and other assistance as may be necessary or desirable to abate the risk of water contamination in the state caused by chemigation.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 33.